Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-1009
Hospital; reimbursement for certain services; conditions.

(1) The state shall provide medicaid reimbursement to a hospital at one hundred percent of the statewide average nursing facility per diem rate for an individual if the individual: (a) Is enrolled in the medical assistance program; (b) has been admitted as an inpatient to such hospital; (c) no longer requires acute inpatient care and discharge planning as described in 42 C.F.R. 482.43; (d) requires nursing facility level of care upon discharge; and (e) is unable to be transferred to a nursing facility due to a lack of available nursing facility beds available to the individual or, in cases where the transfer requires a guardian, has been approved for appointment of a public guardian and the State Court Administrator is unable to appoint a public guardian.

(2) Reimbursement for services shall be subject to federal approval.

Laws 2023, LB227, § 63.